Utah statutes.
73-23-1.   Legislative findings.
(1)  The Legislature finds that the level of the Great Salt Lake has risen
sharply in recent years due to extreme weather conditions.  The high level of
the lake has caused extraordinary flooding conditions resulting in substantial
damage to public and private facilities.  Those conditions pose a threat to
life, health, and property, and in particular may result in extensive damage
to public lands, major transportation routes, and other public facilities.
(2)  The Legislature finds that some of the existing and anticipated
extraordinary flooding conditions can be alleviated by construction of the
West Desert Pumping Project.
(3)  The Legislature declares it is in the public interest and a public
purpose to construct the West Desert Pumping Project as a means of
counteracting the threat to life, health, and property in general and to
public lands, major transportation routes, and other public facilities in
particular.
(4)  The Legislature finds that all activities engaged in under authority of
this chapter are governmental functions and governmental entities and their
officers and employees are immune from suit for any injury or damage resulting
from those activities.
